New Mexico, session 2026, HB201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the attorney general for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 to hire staff to assist a task force convened by the attorney general to study the Inspection of Public Records Act. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .232286.3